Massachusetts, session 194th, S1313.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 19C the following section:-
Section 19D. It shall be unlawful for an employer to knowingly falsify employment or
citizenship documents of any alien in the commonwealth. Any employer who violates this
section shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by imprisonment in jail for not
more than 30 days, or both.
If the employer has been previously convicted by a court of the commonwealth or any
other jurisdiction of a like offense preceding the date of the commission of the offense for which
of 2

the employer is convicted, the employer shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,000 nor
more than $2,500 or by imprisonment in jail for not more than 3 months, or both.
If the employer has been previously convicted by a court of the commonwealth or any
other jurisdiction of a like offense two times preceding the date of the commission of the offense
for which the employer is convicted, the employer shall be punished by a fine of not less than
$2,500 nor more than $5,000 and by imprisonment in jail for not less than 6 months, or both.
of 2